Illinois, session 104th, SB1430.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 19.3 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/19.3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1019.3)7    Sec. 19.3. Water Revolving Fund. 8    (a) There is hereby created within the State Treasury a 9Water Revolving Fund, consisting of 3 interest-bearing special 10programs to be known as the Water Pollution Control Loan 11Program, the Public Water Supply Loan Program, and the Loan 12Support Program, which shall be used and administered by the 13Agency.14    (b) The Water Pollution Control Loan Program shall be used 15and administered by the Agency to provide assistance for the 16following purposes:17        (1) to accept and retain funds from grant awards, 18    appropriations, transfers, and payments of interest and 19    principal;20        (2) to make direct loans at or below market interest 21    rates and to provide additional subsidization, including, 22    but not limited to, forgiveness of principal, negative 23    interest rates, and grants, to any eligible local   SB1430- 2 -LRB104 09255 BDA 19313 b1    government unit to finance the construction of treatments 2    works, including storm water treatment systems that are 3    treatment works, and projects that fulfill federal State 4    Revolving Fund grant requirements for a green project 5    reserve;6        (2.5) with respect to funds provided under the 7    American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009:8            (A) to make direct loans at or below market 9        interest rates to any eligible local government unit 10        and to provide additional subsidization to any 11        eligible local government unit, including, but not 12        limited to, forgiveness of principal, negative 13        interest rates, and grants;14            (B) to make direct loans at or below market 15        interest rates to any eligible local government unit 16        to buy or refinance debt obligations for treatment 17        works incurred on or after October 1, 2008; and18            (C) to provide additional subsidization, 19        including, but not limited to, forgiveness of 20        principal, negative interest rates, and grants for 21        treatment works incurred on or after October 1, 2008; 22        (3) to make direct loans at or below market interest 23    rates and to provide additional subsidization, including, 24    but not limited to, forgiveness of principal, negative 25    interest rates, and grants, to any eligible local 26    government unit to buy or refinance debt obligations for   SB1430- 3 -LRB104 09255 BDA 19313 b1    costs incurred after March 7, 1985, for the construction 2    of treatment works, including storm water treatment 3    systems that are treatment works, and projects that 4    fulfill federal State Revolving Fund grant requirements 5    for a green project reserve;6        (3.5) to make loans, including, but not limited to, 7    loans through a linked deposit program, at or below market 8    interest rates for the implementation of a management 9    program established under Section 319 of the Federal Water 10    Pollution Control Act, as amended;11        (4) to guarantee or purchase insurance for local 12    obligations where such action would improve credit market 13    access or reduce interest rates;14        (5) as a source of revenue or security for the payment 15    of principal and interest on revenue or general obligation 16    bonds issued by the State or any political subdivision or 17    instrumentality thereof, if the proceeds of such bonds 18    will be deposited in the Fund;19        (6) to finance the reasonable costs incurred by the 20    Agency in the administration of the Fund;21        (7) to transfer funds to the Public Water Supply Loan 22    Program; and23        (8) notwithstanding any other provision of this 24    subsection (b), to provide, in accordance with rules 25    adopted under this Title, any other financial assistance 26    that may be provided under Section 603 of the Federal   SB1430- 4 -LRB104 09255 BDA 19313 b1    Water Pollution Control Act for any other projects or 2    activities eligible for assistance under that Section or 3    federal rules adopted to implement that Section. 4    (b-5) The wastewater treatment facility located in the 5Village of Lisbon in Kendall County, specifically located at 6200 East Joliet Street, is allowed to apply for the Water 7Pollution Control Loan Program for the purposes of refinancing 8existing debt.9    (c) The Loan Support Program shall be used and 10administered by the Agency for the following purposes:11        (1) to accept and retain funds from grant awards and 12    appropriations;13        (2) to finance the reasonable costs incurred by the 14    Agency in the administration of the Fund, including 15    activities under Title III of this Act, including the 16    administration of the State construction grant program;17        (3) to transfer funds to the Water Pollution Control 18    Loan Program and the Public Water Supply Loan Program;19        (4) to accept and retain a portion of the loan 20    repayments;21        (5) to finance the development of the low interest 22    loan programs for water pollution control and public water 23    supply projects;24        (6) to finance the reasonable costs incurred by the 25    Agency to provide technical assistance for public water 26    supplies; and  SB1430- 5 -LRB104 09255 BDA 19313 b1        (7) to finance the reasonable costs incurred by the 2    Agency for public water system supervision programs, to 3    administer or provide for technical assistance through 4    source water protection programs, to develop and implement 5    a capacity development strategy, to delineate and assess 6    source water protection areas, and for an operator 7    certification program in accordance with Section 1452 of 8    the federal Safe Drinking Water Act.9    (d) The Public Water Supply Loan Program shall be used and 10administered by the Agency to provide assistance to local 11government units and privately owned community water supplies 12for public water supplies for the following public purposes:13        (1) to accept and retain funds from grant awards, 14    appropriations, transfers, and payments of interest and 15    principal;16        (2) to make direct loans at or below market interest 17    rates and to provide additional subsidization, including, 18    but not limited to, forgiveness of principal, negative 19    interest rates, and grants, to any eligible local 20    government unit or to any eligible privately owned 21    community water supply to finance the construction of 22    water supplies and projects that fulfill federal State 23    Revolving Fund grant requirements for a green project 24    reserve;25        (2.5) with respect to funds provided under the 26    American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009:   SB1430- 6 -LRB104 09255 BDA 19313 b1            (A) to make direct loans at or below market 2        interest rates to any eligible local government unit 3        or to any eligible privately owned community water 4        supply, and to provide additional subsidization to any 5        eligible local government unit or to any eligible 6        privately owned community water supply, including, but 7        not limited to, forgiveness of principal, negative 8        interest rates, and grants; 9            (B) to buy or refinance the debt obligation of a 10        local government unit for costs incurred on or after 11        October 1, 2008; and 12            (C) to provide additional subsidization, 13        including, but not limited to, forgiveness of 14        principal, negative interest rates, and grants for a 15        local government unit for costs incurred on or after 16        October 1, 2008; 17        (3) to make direct loans at or below market interest 18    rates and to provide additional subsidization, including, 19    but not limited to, forgiveness of principal, negative 20    interest rates, and grants, to any eligible local 21    government unit or to any eligible privately owned 22    community water supply to buy or refinance debt 23    obligations for costs incurred on or after July 17, 1997, 24    for the construction of water supplies and projects that 25    fulfill federal State Revolving Fund requirements for a 26    green project reserve;  SB1430- 7 -LRB104 09255 BDA 19313 b1        (4) to guarantee local obligations where such action 2    would improve credit market access or reduce interest 3    rates;4        (5) as a source of revenue or security for the payment 5    of principal and interest on revenue or general obligation 6    bonds issued by the State or any political subdivision or 7    instrumentality thereof, if the proceeds of such bonds 8    will be deposited into the Fund;9        (6) to transfer funds to the Water Pollution Control 10    Loan Program; and11        (7) notwithstanding any other provision of this 12    subsection (d), to provide to local government units and 13    privately owned community water supplies any other 14    financial assistance that may be provided under Section 15    1452 of the federal Safe Drinking Water Act for any 16    expenditures eligible for assistance under that Section or 17    federal rules adopted to implement that Section. 18    (e) The Agency is designated as the administering agency 19of the Fund. The Agency shall submit to the Regional 20Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection 21Agency an intended use plan which outlines the proposed use of 22funds available to the State. The Agency shall take all 23actions necessary to secure to the State the benefits of the 24federal Water Pollution Control Act and the federal Safe 25Drinking Water Act, as now or hereafter amended.26    (f) The Agency shall have the power to enter into   SB1430- 8 -LRB104 09255 BDA 19313 b1intergovernmental agreements with the federal government or 2the State, or any instrumentality thereof, for purposes of 3capitalizing the Water Revolving Fund. Moneys on deposit in 4the Water Revolving Fund may be used for the creation of 5reserve funds or pledged funds that secure the obligations of 6repayment of loans made pursuant to this Section. For the 7purpose of obtaining capital for deposit into the Water 8Revolving Fund, the Agency may also enter into agreements with 9financial institutions and other persons for the purpose of 10selling loans and developing a secondary market for such 11loans. The Agency shall have the power to create and establish 12such reserve funds and accounts as may be necessary or 13desirable to accomplish its purposes under this subsection and 14to allocate its available moneys into such funds and accounts. 15Investment earnings on moneys held in the Water Revolving 16Fund, including any reserve fund or pledged fund, shall be 17deposited into the Water Revolving Fund.18    (g) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory Act 19of the 101st General Assembly, and running for a period of 5 20years after that date, the Agency shall prioritize within its 21annual intended use plan the usage of a portion of the Agency's 22capitalization grant for federally authorized set-aside 23activities. The prioritization is for the purpose of 24supporting disadvantaged communities and utilities throughout 25Illinois in building their capacity for sustainable and 26equitable water management. This may include, but is not   SB1430- 9 -LRB104 09255 BDA 19313 b1limited to, assistance for water rate studies, preliminary 2engineering or other facility planning, training activities, 3asset management plans, assistance with identification and 4replacement of lead service lines, and studies of efficiency 5measures through utility regionalization or other 6collaborative intergovernmental approaches.7(Source: P.A. 101-143, eff. 1-1-20.) 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.